Louisiana, session 2026, HB126.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:284(A), (D), and (F) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§284. Facility dogs; use in court; procedure
A. The court shall allow a any witness who is either under eighteen years of
age, or who has a developmental disability as defined in R.S. 28:451.2, or who is in
a trial for a sex offense as defined in R.S. 15:541 to have be accompanied by a
facility dog, if available, accompany them while testifying in court.
* * *
D. To ensure that the presence of a facility dog does not influence the jury
or is not a reflection on the truthfulness of any testimony that is offered by the victim
or witness, the court shall may order that the presence of the dog be obscured from
the jury at all times and may instruct the jury on the role of the facility dog and, on
the court's own motion or upon request of either party. The court shall ensure that the
facility dog is a trained animal. The facility dog's entry into and exit from the
courtroom shall be done outside the presence of the jury and all precautions should
be taken to obscure the presence of the dog from the jury.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 126 ENROLLED
F. This Section may be referred to and may be cited as "Duvall's Duvall and
Karissa's Law".
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.